Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 14
OTHER OFFENSES

Cross references:

For penalties for class 1 and class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses and class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a).

42-4-1401. Reckless driving - penalty.

A person who drives a motor vehicle, bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or low-power scooter in such a manner as to indicate either a wanton or a willful disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving. A person convicted of reckless driving of a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter is not subject to section 42-2-127.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense. Upon a second or subsequent conviction, such person shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2392, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1279, § 57, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2561, § 11, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1203 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1401 was relocated to § 42-4-1601.

Cross references:

For operating a vehicle in a reckless manner while eluding a peace officer, see § 18-9-116.5; for provision that the operation of vehicles and the movement of pedestrians pursuant to this section apply upon streets and highways and elsewhere throughout the state, see § 42-4-103 (2)(b).

42-4-1402. Careless driving - penalty.

A person who drives a motor vehicle, bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or low-power scooter in a careless and imprudent manner, without due regard for the width, grade, curves, corners, traffic, and use of the streets and highways and all other attendant circumstances, is guilty of careless driving. A person convicted of careless driving of a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter is not subject to section 42-2-127.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2), any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

If the person's actions are the proximate cause of bodily injury to another, such person commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense.

If the person's actions are the proximate cause of death to another, such person commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2392, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1280, § 58, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (SB 10-204), ch. 243, p. 1080, § 2, effective May 21.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2561, § 12, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1204 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1402 was relocated to § 42-4-1602.

Cross references:

For provision that the operation of vehicles and the movement of pedestrians pursuant to this section apply upon streets and highways and elsewhere throughout the state, see § 42-4-103 (2)(b).

42-4-1402.5. Vulnerable road user - prohibition - violations and penalties - definition.

Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "vulnerable road user" means:

A pedestrian;

A person engaged in work upon a roadway or upon utility facilities along a roadway;

A person providing emergency services within a right-of-way;

A peace officer who is outside a motor vehicle and performing the peace officer's duties in a right-of-way;

A person riding or leading an animal; or

A person lawfully using any of the following on a public right-of-way, crosswalk, or shoulder of the roadway:

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, tricycle, or other pedal-powered vehicle;

A farm tractor or similar vehicle designed primarily for farm use;

A skateboard;

Roller skates;

In-line skates;

A scooter;

A moped;

A motorcycle;

An off-highway vehicle;

An animal-drawn, wheeled vehicle;

Farm equipment;

A sled;

An electric personal assistive mobility device;

A wheelchair;

A baby stroller; or

A nonmotorized pull wagon.

Prohibition. A person who drives a motor vehicle in violation of section 42-4-1402 and whose actions are the proximate cause of serious bodily injury, as defined in section 42-4-1601 (4)(b), to a vulnerable road user commits infliction of serious bodily injury to a vulnerable road user.

Violations and penalties.

Infliction of serious bodily injury to a vulnerable road user is a class 1 traffic misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalties imposed in subsections (3)(a) and (3)(c) of this section, the court may order the violator to:

Attend a driver improvement course in accordance with section 42-4-1717; and

Perform useful public service for a number of hours, which must not exceed three hundred twenty hours, to be determined by the court in accordance with section 18-1.3-507.

In addition to the penalties imposed in subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b) of this section, a person who is convicted of violating this section is subject to:

License suspension in accordance with section 42-2-127; and

An order of restitution under part 6 of article 1.3 of title 18.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-175), ch. 331, p. 3070, § 2, effective May 29.

42-4-1403. Following fire apparatus prohibited.

The driver of any vehicle other than one on official business shall not follow any fire apparatus traveling in response to a fire alarm closer than five hundred feet or drive into or park such vehicle within the block where fire apparatus has stopped in answer to a fire alarm. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2392, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1205 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1403 was relocated to § 42-4-1603.

42-4-1404. Crossing fire hose.

No vehicle shall be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department used at any fire, alarm of fire, or practice runs or laid down on any street, private driveway, or highway without the consent of the fire department official in command. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2392, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1206 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1404 was relocated to § 42-4-1604.

42-4-1405. Riding in trailers.

No person shall occupy a trailer while it is being moved upon a public highway. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2393, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-113 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1405 was relocated to § 42-4-1605.

42-4-1406. Foreign matter on highway prohibited.

No person shall throw or deposit upon or along any highway any glass bottle, glass, stones, nails, tacks, wire, cans, container of human waste, or other substance likely to injure any person, animal, or vehicle upon or along such highway.

No person shall throw, drop, or otherwise expel a lighted cigarette, cigar, match, or other burning material from a motor vehicle upon any highway.

Any person who drops, or permits to be dropped or thrown, upon any highway or structure any destructive or injurious material or lighted or burning substance shall immediately remove the same or cause it to be removed.

Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway from such vehicle.

No person shall excavate a ditch or other aqueduct, or construct any flume or pipeline or any steam, electric, or other railway, or construct any approach to a public highway without written consent of the authority responsible for the maintenance of that highway.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Any person who violates any provision of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Any person who violates paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section by throwing or depositing a container of human waste upon or along any highway shall be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars in lieu of the penalty and surcharge prescribed in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(N).

As used in this section:

"Container" includes, but is not limited to, a bottle, a can, a box, or a diaper.

"Human waste" means urine or feces produced by a human.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2393, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002, 3rd Ex. Sess.:

Entire section amended, p. 52, § 1, effective July 18.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (5)(b) amended and (6) added, p. 137, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 2006:

(5)(b)(I) amended, p. 1512, § 74, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1207 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1406 was relocated to § 42-4-1606.

42-4-1407. Spilling loads on highways prohibited - prevention of spilling of aggregate, trash, or recyclables.

No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any highway unless such vehicle is constructed or loaded or the load thereof securely covered to prevent any of its load from blowing, dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping therefrom; except that material may be dropped for the purpose of securing traction or water or other substance may be sprinkled on a roadway in cleaning or maintaining such roadway.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 99, p. 295

, § 1, effective July 1, 1999.)

(2.4) (a) A vehicle shall not be driven or moved on a highway if the vehicle is transporting trash or recyclables unless at least one of the following conditions is met:

The load is covered by a tarp or other cover in a manner that prevents the load from blowing, dropping, shifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping from the vehicle;

The vehicle utilizes other technology that prevents the load from blowing, dropping, shifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping from the vehicle;

The load is required to be secured under and complies with 49 CFR parts 392 and 393; or

The vehicle is loaded in such a manner or the load itself has physical characteristics such that the contents will not escape from the vehicle. Such a load may include, but is not limited to, heavy scrap metal or hydraulically compressed scrap recyclables.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.4) shall not apply to a motor vehicle in the process of collecting trash or recyclables within a one-mile radius of the motor vehicle's last collection point.

(2.5) (a) No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any highway for a distance of more than two miles if the vehicle is transporting aggregate material with a diameter of one inch or less unless:

The load is covered by a tarp or other cover in a manner that prevents the aggregate material from blowing, dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping from the vehicle; or

The vehicle utilizes other technology that prevents the aggregate material from blowing, dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping from the vehicle.

Nothing in this subsection (2.5) shall apply to a vehicle:

Operating entirely within a marked construction zone;

Involved in maintenance of public roads during snow or ice removal operations; or

Involved in emergency operations when requested by a law enforcement agency or an emergency response authority designated in or pursuant to section

29-22-102

, C.R.S.

(2.7) For the purposes of this section:

"Aggregate material" means any rock, clay, silts, gravel, limestone, dimension stone, marble, and shale; except that "aggregate material" does not include hot asphalt, including asphalt patching material, wet concrete, or other materials not susceptible to blowing.

"Recyclables" means material or objects that can be reused, reprocessed, remanufactured, reclaimed, or recycled.

"Trash" means material or objects that have been or are in the process of being discarded or transported.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection (3), any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Any person who violates any provision of this section while driving or moving a car or pickup truck without causing bodily injury to another person commits a class A traffic infraction.

Any person who violates any provision of this section while driving or moving a car or pickup truck and thereby proximately causes bodily injury to another person commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2393, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1101, § 22, effective June 1; entire section amended, p. 4252, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 295, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 241, § 1, effective July 1; (2.4) added and (2.7) amended, p. 412, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(2.4)(a) amended, p. 104, § 1, effective April 5.

42-4-1407.5. Splash guards - when required - definition.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Splash guards" means mud flaps, rubber, plastic or fabric aprons, or other devices directly behind the rear-most wheels, designed to minimize the spray of water and other substances to the rear.

"Splash guards" must, at a minimum, be wide enough to cover the full tread of the tire or tires being protected, hang perpendicular from the vehicle not more than ten inches above the surface of the street or highway when the vehicle is empty, and generally maintain their perpendicular relationship under normal driving conditions.

Except as otherwise permitted in this section, no vehicle or motor vehicle shall be driven or moved on any street or highway unless the vehicle or motor vehicle is equipped with splash guards. However, vehicles and motor vehicles with splash guards that violate this section shall be allowed to remain in service for the time necessary to continue to a place where the deficient splash guards will be replaced. Such replacement shall occur at the first reasonable opportunity.

This section does not apply to:

Passenger-carrying motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 42-3-306 (2);

Trucks and truck tractors registered pursuant to section 42-3-306 (4) or (5) having an empty weight of ten thousand pounds or less;

Trailers equipped with fenders or utility pole trailers;

Vehicles while involved in chip and seal or paving operations or road widening equipment;

Truck tractors or converter dollies when used in combination with other vehicles;

Vehicles drawn by animals; or

Bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, or electric scooters.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 296, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, p. 1512, § 75, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-014), ch. 136, p. 592, § 1, effective August 5; (3)(g) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1280, § 59, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2039, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(g) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2562, § 13, effective May 23.

42-4-1408. Operation of motor vehicles on property under control of or owned by parks and recreation districts.

Any metropolitan recreation district, any park and recreation district organized pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., or any recreation district organized pursuant to the provisions of part 7 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S., referred to in this section as a "district", shall have the authority to designate areas on property owned or controlled by the district in which the operation of motor vehicles shall be prohibited. Areas in which it shall be prohibited to operate motor vehicles shall be clearly posted by a district.

It is unlawful for any person to operate a motor vehicle in an area owned or under the control of a district if the district has declared the operation of motor vehicles to be prohibited in such area, as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2393, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1212 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1408 was relocated to § 42-4-1608.

42-4-1409. Compulsory insurance - penalty - legislative intent.

No owner of a motor vehicle or low-power scooter required to be registered in this state shall operate the vehicle or permit it to be operated on the public highways of this state when the owner has failed to have a complying policy or certificate of self-insurance in full force and effect as required by law.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle or low-power scooter on the public highways of this state without a complying policy or certificate of self-insurance in full force and effect as required by law.

When an accident occurs, or when requested to do so following any lawful traffic contact or during any traffic investigation by a peace officer, an owner or operator of a motor vehicle or low-power scooter shall present to the requesting officer immediate evidence of a complying policy or certificate of self-insurance in full force and effect as required by law.

As used in this section, "evidence of a complying policy or certificate of self-insurance in full force and effect" includes the presentation of such a policy or certificate upon a cell phone or other electronic device.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense. The minimum fine imposed by section 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II)(A) shall be mandatory, and the defendant shall be punished by a minimum mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars. The court may suspend up to one half of the fine upon a showing that appropriate insurance as required pursuant to section 10-4-619 or 10-4-624, C.R.S., has been obtained. Nothing in this paragraph (a) shall be construed to prevent the court from imposing a fine greater than the minimum mandatory fine.

Upon a second or subsequent conviction under this section within a period of five years following a prior conviction under this section, in addition to any imprisonment imposed pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II)(A), the defendant shall be punished by a minimum mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars, and the court shall not suspend such minimum fine. The court or the court collections' investigator may establish a payment schedule for a person convicted of the provisions of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, and the provisions of section 16-11-101.6, C.R.S., shall apply. The court may suspend up to one half of the fine upon a showing that appropriate insurance as required pursuant to section 10-4-619 or 10-4-624, C.R.S., has been obtained.

In addition to the penalties prescribed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (4), any person convicted pursuant to this section may, at the discretion of the court, be sentenced to perform not less than forty hours of community service, subject to the provisions of section 18-1.3-507, C.R.S.

Testimony of the failure of any owner or operator of a motor vehicle or low-power scooter to present immediate evidence of a complying policy or certificate of self-insurance in full force and effect as required by law, when requested to do so by a peace officer, shall constitute prima facie evidence, at a trial concerning a violation charged under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, that such owner or operator of a motor vehicle violated subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

A person charged with violating subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section shall not be convicted if the person produces in court a bona fide complying policy or certificate of self-insurance that was in full force and effect as required by law at the time of the alleged violation. The court clerk's office may dismiss the charge if it verifies that the person had a valid policy in effect at the time of the alleged violation using the uninsured motorist identification database created in section 42-7-602.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2003, p. 2648

, § 7, effective July 1, 2003.)

(8.5) If an operator of a motor vehicle or low-power scooter uses a cell phone or other electronic device to present evidence of a complying policy or certificate of self-insurance in full force and effect, as described in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section:

The law enforcement officer to whom the operator presents the device shall not explore the contents of the cell phone or other electronic device other than to examine the operator's policy or certificate of self-insurance; and

The law enforcement officer to whom the operator presents the device and any law enforcement agency that employs the officer are immune from any civil damages resulting from the officer dropping or otherwise unintentionally damaging the cell phone or other electronic device.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the money collected as fines imposed pursuant to subsections (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this section are to be used for the supervision of the public highways. The general assembly determines that law enforcement agencies that patrol and maintain the public safety on public highways are supervising the public highways. The general assembly further determines that an authorized agent is supervising the public highways through his or her enforcement of the requirements for demonstration of proof of motor vehicle insurance pursuant to section 42-3-105 (1)(d). Therefore, of the money collected from fines pursuant to subsections (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this section, fifty percent shall be transferred to the law enforcement agency that issued the ticket for a violation of this section. The remaining fifty percent of the money collected from fines for violations of subsection (4)(a) or (4)(b) of this section shall be transmitted to the authorized agent for the county in which the violation occurred.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2394, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(4)(c) amended, p. 315, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(8) added by revision, p. 1452, § 8.

L. 2001:

(8) amended, p. 525, § 12, effective May 22.

L. 2002:

(4)(c) amended, p. 1562, § 369, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(4)(a) and (4)(b) amended, p. 1885, § 2, effective May 22; (1), (2), (3), (4)(a), (4)(b), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1575, § 16, effective July 1; (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (8) amended, p. 2648, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4)(a) and (4)(b) amended and (9) added, p. 793, § 3, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2005:

(7) amended, p. 1177, § 18, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(9) amended, p. 1512, § 76, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (2), (3), (5), and (7) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1280, § 60, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2013:

(3) amended and (8.5) added, (HB 13-1159), ch. 101, p. 321, § 1, effective August 7; (6) amended, (HB 13-1022), ch. 139, p. 453, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(7) repealed, (SB 14-131), ch. 388, p. 1943, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(9) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 372, § 22, effective August 9.

42-4-1410. Proof of financial responsibility required - suspension of license.

Any person convicted of violating section 42-4-1409 (1) shall file and maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future as prescribed in sections 42-7-408 to 42-7-412. Said proof of insurance shall be maintained for a period of three years from the date of conviction.

The clerk of a court or the judge of a court which has no clerk shall forward to the executive director of the department of revenue a certified record of any conviction under section 42-4-1409 (1). Upon receipt of any such certified record, the director shall give written notice to the person convicted that such person shall be required to provide proof of financial responsibility for the future for a period of three years from the date of conviction and advising such person of the manner in which proof is to be provided. If no proof as required is provided to the director within a period of twenty days from the time notice is given or if at any time when proof is required to be maintained it is not so maintained or becomes invalid, the director shall suspend the driver's license of the person from whom proof is required and shall not reinstate the license of such person until proof of financial responsibility is provided.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2395, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1207, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) added by revision, p. 1452, § 8.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 525, § 13, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 2649, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3) repealed, p. 1011, § 4, effective July 1.

42-4-1410.5. Providing false evidence of proof of motor vehicle insurance - penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to offer, use, or attempt to offer or use any means, manner, type of paper, document, card, digital image, or any other proof of motor vehicle liability insurance required by state law to a law enforcement officer, judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or employee of a court clerk's office with the intent to mislead that official regarding the status of any motor vehicle liability insurance policy in the course of an official investigation, or for purposes of dismissing any charge under section 42-4-1409 or reducing any penalty imposed under section 42-4-1409, where such means, manner, type, or kind of proof of insurance offered or used, or that is attempted to be offered or used, is known or should be known by the person to be false, fraudulent, or incorrect in any material manner or way, or which is known or should be known by the person to be altered, forged, defaced, or changed in any material respect, unless such changes are required or authorized by law.

Violation of this section is a class B traffic infraction, punishable by a fine of up to five hundred dollars.

A person who is convicted of, who admits liability for, or against whom a judgment is entered for a violation of this section shall be deemed, but only for purposes of section 18-1-408, C.R.S., to have been convicted of a criminal offense.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1022), ch. 139, p. 453, § 2, effective August 7.

42-4-1411. Use of earphones while driving.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle while wearing earphones.

For purposes of this subsection (1), "earphones" includes any headset, radio, tape player, or other similar device which provides the listener with radio programs, music, or other recorded information through a device attached to the head and which covers all of or a portion of the ears. "Earphones" does not include speakers or other listening devices that are built into protective headgear or a device or portion of a device that only covers all or a portion of one ear and that is connected to a wireless, handheld telephone.

Any person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Nothing in this section authorizes the holder of a commercial driver's license issued pursuant to part 4 of article 2 of this title to act in violation of any federal law or regulation relating to driving a commercial vehicle.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2395, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2015:

(1)(b) amended and (3) added, (HB 15-1207), ch. 47, p. 115, § 1, effective March 26.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-237 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1411 was relocated to § 42-4-1611.